Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 12 Enforcement of Title

3-12-1.
Duty of deputy sheriffs, town constables, and police officers — Action on taxpayer’s demand.

Members of the division of sheriffs, the city and town sergeants, town constables, officers, members of the town or city police, and members of the division of state police are empowered and it is made their duty to see that the provisions of this title and the rules and regulations made or authorized by the department of business regulation and the division of taxation are enforced within their counties, towns, and cities. It is their special duty to use their utmost efforts to repress and prevent crime by the suppression of unlicensed liquor shops, gambling places, and houses of ill fame, and they shall also do so on the request of any taxpayer of any town or city and may command aid in the execution of the authority conferred. Any officer within the above enumeration who willfully neglects or refuses to perform the duties imposed upon him or her by this section shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) and be rendered ineligible again to be appointed to this position; provided, that the officer may after investigation, before taking any further action at the request of any taxpayer, demand that the taxpayer requesting him or her to act give a bond to secure to that officer reasonable compensation for his or her services and to protect him or her from all costs and damages that may arise from that action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 174, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-1

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 13; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 1.

3-12-2.
Special constables not authorized to serve civil process.

Nothing in this title conferring powers on the officers authorizes special constables to make service of civil process.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 174, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-2

.

3-12-3.
Entry on licensed premises — Arrest without warrant — Evidence of unlawful sales.

The mayor and council of any city, or the town council, or either member, or the chief of police of any city or town, or any police officer, or any town constable specially authorized by that city or town council, or any member of the division of state police, or agent of the department of business regulation and the division of taxation, may at any time enter upon the premises of any person licensed under this title to ascertain the manner in which that person conducts his or her business and to preserve order; and every chief of police, police officer, town constable or member of the division of state police, has the power to arrest, without a warrant, all persons found actually engaged, in the premises entered, in the commission of any offense in violation of any of the provisions of this title and to keep those persons arrested in custody until they can be brought before some magistrate (but for a period not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours) having the proper jurisdiction of that offense in that city or town to be dealt with according to law; and whenever any person is seen to drink any beverage in those premises, or in any part of those premises, on any days or hours prohibited, under this title, it is evidence that those beverages were sold and kept for sale by the occupant of those premises or his or her authorized agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 71; G.L. 1938, ch. 174, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-3

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 13; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 1.

3-12-4.
Search warrants.

Search warrants to search for and seize any beverages, impure or adulterated liquors, vessels containing beverages or impure or adulterated liquors, or other property possessed, kept for sale or otherwise in violation of any of the provisions of this title may be issued as provided by law in chapter 5 of title 12.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 54; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-4

; P.L. 1956, ch. 168, § 4.

3-12-5 — 3-12-8.
Repealed.

3-12-9.
Forfeiture of goods held for unlawful sale.

All beverages and the vessels containing them, seized under this title, kept for sale in violation of law, are forfeited to the state, and the officer making the seizure or an officer designated by the court for that purpose, shall forthwith proceed to prosecute for the forfeiture in the manner provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 58; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-9

.

3-12-10.
Return of goods when forfeiture not adjudged.

If the cause of forfeiture is not proved, then all the seized beverages and the vessels containing them shall be restored to the proper owner or to the place from which they were taken by the officer who seized them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 59; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-10

.

3-12-11.
Sentence of forfeiture — Appeal.

If the cause of forfeiture is proved, the court before which the complaint or information shall be tried shall enter sentence of forfeiture to the state against those beverages and the casks or other vessels containing them; and any person aggrieved by the sentence may appeal the sentence to the superior court according to the provisions relating to criminal appeals from district courts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 59; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-11

.

3-12-12.
Destruction of forfeited beverages.

Upon entry of sentence of forfeiture, if no appeal is then taken and no recognizance given as prescribed in other criminal cases, the court shall forthwith issue a warrant to the officer, commanding the officer forthwith to destroy the beverages; and the officer shall execute the warrant and return it, having signed it, to the court, within any time as the court shall direct. In case of final judgment for the state on appeal, the court entering the final judgment shall issue the warrant for the destruction of the beverages seized.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 60; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-12

.

3-12-13.
Disposition of forfeited beverages to institutions.

In lieu of ordering the destruction of intoxicating liquors forfeited to the state, the court may, in its discretion, order the beverages disposed of to state or charitable institutions for use by them for medicinal purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1857, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-13

.

3-12-14.
Disposition of forfeited vessels.

The officers having in their custody any vessels which have been forfeited to the state under this chapter, are authorized to destroy those vessels, or to sell those vessels at public auction or private sale and to turn over the net proceeds of that sale to the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2014, § 61; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-14

.

3-12-15.
Fees in forfeiture proceedings.

There shall be allowed and paid to the officer who makes the seizure, for every seizure made under the foregoing provisions, the sum of five dollars ($5.00) with two dollars ($2.00) additional for every day after the first that the officer shall be necessarily employed in causing the beverages seized to be condemned, and ten cents (10¢) for every mile which he or she shall travel, together with any reasonable sum as the court may deem just for necessary expense incurred in providing storage for liquors seized, pending proceedings for condemnation; all which costs shall be taxed in the bill of costs, and the amount allowed by the court in which final judgment shall be rendered, to those officers, shall be paid on the order of the state controller out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated. Any fees paid to any state official shall be returned by him or her to the general treasurer to and for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 63; G.L. 1938, ch. 172, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-15

.

3-12-16.
Allegations in criminal proceedings.

In any action, complaint and warrant, information, indictment, or other proceeding, against any person for a violation of any of the provisions of this title, it is not necessary to set forth the kind or quantity of beverage, or the time of the sale or manufacturer of the beverage; but proof of the violation of any of the provisions of this title, the substance of which is briefly set forth, within the times mentioned, by the person complained of, shall be good and sufficient. In order to convict any person of a second, third or any subsequent offense under any of the provisions of this title, it is requisite in any action, complaint and warrant, indictment, or other proceeding against any person for a violation of the provisions of this title to set forth a record of a former conviction or former convictions, with the date or dates of that former conviction or convictions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 73; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-16

.

3-12-17.
Correction of defects in proceedings.

Any defects of form in any action, complaint and warrant, indictment, information, or other proceeding against any person for a violation of this title, may be amended by the court before whom the action, complaint and warrant, indictment, information, or other proceeding is originally brought.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 74; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-17

.

3-12-18.
Negative allegations — Lawful sale as defense.

Negative allegations need not be made in or proved at the trial of any complaint under this title. Evidence of the sale or keeping for sale of any beverage is evidence that the sale or keeping for sale is unlawful, but the respondent in any complaint under this title may show any license or authority to sell or any other fact that renders a sale or keeping for sale lawful by way of defense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-18

.

3-12-19.
Officers not liable for costs.

An officer of the law complaining on account of the violation of any of the provisions of this title is not required at the time of complaint or thereafter to enter into recognizance or in any way to become liable for the costs that may accrue on the complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 68; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-19

.

3-12-20.
Appeal from convictions.

Any person convicted before a district court of any offense under this title may appeal the sentence of that court, according to the provisions of law relating to criminal appeals from district courts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 65; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-20

.

3-12-21.
Recognizance of witnesses on appeal.

In case of an appeal pursuant to §

3-12-20

, the district court shall, upon motion either of the complainant or defendant, require any witness sworn, to enter into recognizance in the sum of fifty dollars ($50.00) with condition that he or she will appear before the court appealed to, to testify in the trial of the appeal whenever that appeal shall be called for trial.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 66; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-21

.

3-12-22.
Complainant’s attorney — Prosecution by attorney general.

In all cases of appeal under this title from the sentence of a district court, and upon all questions arising under that sentence or under any complaint or warrant made under this title in the supreme or superior court, the cases may be conducted and argued in behalf of the complainant by any attorney who may be employed or authorized by that complainant; and in every case in which the defendant or person answering the complaint is required to pay costs, the sum of six dollars ($6.00) shall be taxed in the bill of costs for the services of the attorney employed or authorized and appearing as the attorney of record of the complainant; for which sum the clerk or other officer to whom the costs may be paid shall account with and pay over to the attorney of record within ten (10) days after the bill of costs is paid.

If no attorney within five (5) days after the appeal from the sentence of a district court, or after any question arising under that sentence or under any complaint or warrant under this title, is presented in the supreme or superior court, shall enter his or her appearance in behalf of the complainant, then it is the duty of the attorney general or the assistant attorneys general to take charge of, conduct, argue, and manage that appeal or question in the supreme or superior court, and for those services the sum of six dollars ($6.00) shall be taxed in the bill of costs, and shall be paid over to the officers rendering those services by the clerk or other officer to whom those costs are paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 75; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-22

.

3-12-23.
Notice of conviction to department and local authorities.

It is the duty of each clerk of a court upon the final conviction or sentence of any person for violating any provision of this title, to notify, within ten (10) days after that final conviction or sentence, the town council of the town or the board of commissioners for granting of licenses of the city or town where the person convicted or sentenced at the time of the complaint carried on business, and also at the time of the conviction carries on business, and also to notify the department of business regulation and the division of taxation within ten (10) days after the final conviction or sentence of the fact of that final conviction or sentence and of the offense for which that final conviction or sentence was had, and any clerk who neglects or refuses to notify as provided in this section shall be fined fifty dollars ($50.00) for each and every offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 72; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-23

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 13.

3-12-24.
Disposition of fines.

All fines recovered under this title shall inure to the sole benefit of the state except for those fines imposed pursuant to §

3-5-21

by a local licensing board which fines shall inure to the city or town first imposing that fine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 64; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

3-12-24

; P.L. 1986, ch. 364, § 1.